Washington statutes.
RCW 21.20.920

Application of prior law.

Prior law applies in respect to any offer or sale made within one year after the *effective date of this chapter pursuant to an offering begun in good faith before its effective date on the basis of an exemption available under prior law.

[ 1959 c 282 s 65.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The "effective date of this chapter" is midnight June 10, 1959, see preface 1959 session laws.